Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-735.01
Election of trustees; ballots; election board; duties.

At any election held to elect trustees of a sanitary and improvement district, the ballots shall be received, counted, and canvassed by an election board of two persons or more appointed by the election commissioner or the county clerk in counties having no election commissioner.

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 15;

Laws 1982, LB 359, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 652, § 5.